Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1531.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4307. Child torture.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of child torture if that person intentionally or knowingly engages in a course of conduct against a child that includes more than one of the following:(1) Torture.(2) Physical assault.(3) Unreasonable or extended confinement or restraint.(4) Unreasonable or extended activity or forced holding of position.(5) Intentional failure to provide care, protection or 123456789101112131415161718 support.(b) Grading.--An offense under this section shall be a felony of the first degree.(c) Evidence and defenses.--(1) Expert testimony as to the existence or extent of mental anguish or psychological abuse shall not be a requirement for a conviction under this section.(2) It shall not be a defense that a child has a particular susceptibility to mental anguish or psychological abuse.(3) Evidence that the child suffered pain shall not be required to sustain a conviction.(d) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to any action of a parent or guardian or other person similarly responsible for the general care and supervision of a child or a person acting at the request of the parent, guardian or other responsible adult if:(1) the action is used for the purpose of safeguarding or promoting the welfare of the child, including preventing misbehavior or punishment of the child's misbehavior; and(2) the action is not designed to cause or known to create substantial risk of death, serious bodily injury, disfigurement, extreme or unnecessary pain or mental distress, gross degradation or humiliation.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child." A person under 18 years of age when the course of conduct under subsection (a) begins."Torture." Causing bodily injury or serious bodily injury as 20250HB1531PN1788 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined in section 2301 (relating to definitions) or acting in an especially depraved manner to create a substantial and unjustifiable risk of mental or psychological harm.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1531PN1788 - 3 - 1234